Washington statutes.
RCW 18.160.130

Fire protection compliance account.

The fire protection compliance account is created in the custody of the state treasurer. All fines collected under RCW 18.160.120 and the rules and regulations adopted under RCW 18.160.120 must be deposited into the account. Expenditures from the account may only be used for the purposes of enforcing this chapter. Only the state director of fire protection or their designee may authorize expenditures from the account. The account is subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for expenditures.

[ 2023 c 329 s 4.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2023 c 329: See note following RCW 18.160.030.